Utah statutes.
61-2-5 (Superseded 01/01/10).   Division of Real Estate created -- Functions
-- Director appointed -- Functions.
(1)  There is created within the Department of Commerce a Division of Real
Estate.  It is responsible for the administration and enforcement of:
(a)  this chapter;
(b)  Title 57, Chapter 11, Utah Uniform Land Sales Practices Act;
(c)  Title 57, Chapter 19, Timeshare and Camp Resort Act;
(d)  Title 57, Chapter 23, Real Estate Cooperative Marketing Act;
(e)  Chapter 2a, Real Estate Recovery Fund Act;
(f)  Chapter 2b, Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act;
(g)  Chapter 2c, Utah Residential Mortgage Practices Act; and
(h)  Chapter 2e, Appraisal Management Company Registration and Regulation Act.
(2)  The division is under the direction and control of a director appointed
by the executive director of the department with the approval of the governor.
The director holds the office of director at the pleasure of the governor.
(3)  The director, with the approval of the executive director, may employ
personnel necessary to discharge the duties of the division at salaries to be
fixed by the director according to standards established by the Department of
Administrative Services.
(4)  On or before October 1 of each year, the director shall, in conjunction
with the department, report to the governor and the Legislature concerning the
division's work for the preceding fiscal year ending June 30.
(5)  The director, in conjunction with the executive director, shall prepare
and submit to the governor and the Legislature a budget for the fiscal year
next following the convening of the Legislature.
